4 It was good. Food was tasty and we love doing family style so everyone gets plenty of options. Only downside was the $300 bottle of wine we ordered was not good yet the manager didnt seem to care when we said something even before pouring.
5 The restaurant totally made up for the lack of impressivness I got from going to the club the week before.  The service, food, and ambiance is really spectacular in the restaurant.  I have never been to a more perfect date place.  Very intimate and all the food comes out perfectly portioned for two to share.  The waiters were very professional and assisted us with ordering some phenominal dishes.  The veggie dumplings and the veggie assorted platter were perfect starters and then we got noodles and my date got a meat dish which was cooked well, and I got the sweet and sour veggies which were also spectacular.  To round out we got the PB&J which was great and new to my pallet in the way it was put together.  Highly recommended.  Its not too big so don't worry if you are full.  The drinks were tasty as well, we got one signature cocktail each.  The only quip I have (which i wouldn't even fault them for at all) was that the two appetizers came out back to back without any break inbetween.  This made it hard to really clear my pallett to taste each dish seperatly.  But overall what I would expect from the venue.  Dripping high class and perfection in every possible aspect.  I can't wait to return.  Just gotta save up a little money first!
5 Amazing staff.  Everyone was so pleasant and nice and very attentive.  The waitress gave wonderful recommendations and the managers came to check on us many times.  The food was great as well! We ordered many small eats as well as shared 2 dishes for 4 people.  We were going out that night so didn't want to eat too heavy.  Dim sum was amazing as well as the duck salad.  I recommend getting their drinks. We didn't like one of them and they had no problem returning it and getting us a different one.   Perfect place to have a romantic date or a night out with the girls/guys!
5 Really incredible. If u like Chinese food this is one of the better places in the world for it. Expensive but u won't even noticed when u eat the braised tofu, or champagne cod, or the ribeye. Everything it's just perfect, service amazing to. And cocktails sweet but u have to have them set when u have Chinese food. U can just come to Vegas to eat @ hakkasan. Them go back home. That's what I did. Cheers
5 I am simply in love with Hakkasan! The restaurant is dark and intimate with lots of dark carved wood. The table sections are separated with carved wooden walls creating an exclusive and private setting.  My friends and I sampled a few of their best menu items and the must-order was the Crispy Duck Salad it was so delicious. In fact, remembering it right now is making my mouth water. Another one of their best dishes would be the Mongolian Style Beef Tenderloin. It just melts in your mouth! Not to mention their mouth-watering cocktails of which we had The Hakka, their signature drink with coconut, passion fruit and lychee juice. Green Destiny was a very fresh cocktail with cucumber, kiwi, and apple juice and Agave No. 8 a tequila cocktail with orange, lime, and cinnamon.   We finished off our meal with two desserts 'PB&J' which is a peanut butter parfait. It was a five-star upgrade of any peanut butter delicacy that you have had in your life. It had sour cherry jam, banana & passion fruit sorbet. What an explosion of flavors!! We also had the Exotic Fruit Platter. The plate presentation was a work of art. Too bad I was too busy eating to take pictures!!  Big thanks go to our server Jen who knew the menu inside and out and described everything intricately. Every other server who came to our table was very knowledgeable as well. They all painted a picture of every dish as they set it down on the table and our expectations were met (if not exceeded) every single time.   We will definitely come back!
4 I have been hearing fabulous things about the new nightlife mecca that is Hakkasan long before it's opening this past April. My friend does PR for the brand and I grew up in Las Vegas, so any new opening  is exciting and warrants a trip home to see what all the buzz is about.  We made reservations weeks before, and had planned to eat around 8:30 on Saturday before entering the club later to see Tiesto. It is a bit tricky to find/enter the restaurant, because you have to walk through the entirety of the massive MGM casino floor to the other side, and navigate the signs and ropes that herd the club-goers into their appropriate lines to find a little opening that says "restaurant".  Inside, blue lights glow and 4 hostesses wait behind a lobby desk to check you in.   The service is impeccable from the start, and although we were a few minutes late (leave about 15 minutes to walk through the MGM), we were seated right away. The restaurant takes up the first 2 floors of the 5 story Hakkasan space, and the interior is breathtaking.  While the restaurant is huge, it is broken up into intimate spaces by an endless web of intricately woven wooden panels stationed horizontally and vertically. The walls glow blue, and the dark wood decor is tasteful and elegant. The menu is vast, and is broken up into sections i.e. Meat, Fish, Veggies, Starch, etc. like a standard Chinese restaurant, but we asked our server for recommendations.    We started with the Crispy Duck Salad which is one of their renowned items and for good reason. The duck alone is divine, it is poached and steamed in a chinese spice mixture for hours before being fried in rice flour, then added to a plum dressing mixture with greens, pine nuts, pomelos, and more mouth-watering ingredients. It was truly astonishing how amazing it was.   Next came the Sesame Shrimp Toast w/ Foie Gras which I was most excited about, since CA has outlawed the delectable delicacy, but I was greatly disappointed. The dish was 4 hearty spheres of a solid shrimp mixture completely coated in sesame seeds.  Supposedly when we bit into them, foie gras would ooze out but that was not the case. If there was foie gras in there, we did not find it. Disappointing and bland.   Next we ordered a cup of Hot & Sour soup, a dish my boyfriend and I both love and were curious to see how Hakkasan interpreted it. It was good, different though... it had a sweet and almost fishy flavor to the broth.   For our larger dishes we ordered the Black Pepper Rib-eye Merlot Stir-fry which came with sauteed onions and garlic and was absolutely out of this world.  Some of the most tender steak I've had in general, and was a wonderful experience to have that flavor and texture in a stir-fry dish.  We also ordered the Sweet & Sour Pork which was fresh and very flavorful.    We had wanted to order the fried crab appetizer and a veggie dish as well, but realized quickly we were getting very full because we foolishly had a snack at the Todd English Pub around 5:30 pm (more on that later!). I wish we could have sampled more dishes and cocktails...I only tried the Hakka which was vodka and sake mixed with passion fruit and lychee juice and was absolutely incredible.   The menu provides plenty of options for a fantastic meal, for 2 our bill was about $137. There are also specialty dishes with abalone and caviar and some seafood dishes that can run up to $400, so clearly it depends what you order. I believe the average cocktail is $15-18, although they also offer about 5 for $120. So, you can choose what type of experience you wish to have, although dining at Hakkasan alone is absolutely an indulgent and upscale experience.  Our waitress Catalina was the most gracious, helpful, and genuinely fantastic server we have had in years, she really helped make our experience memorable. I can't wait to go back and try the rest of the menu, hopefully I will in 3 weeks when I'm back in my home away from home!
5 Unbelievable Goodness!  Got a last minute reservation and was utterly satisfied! From the moment we were greeted at the door to our food being delivered at our table, it was fantastic!  Order a quite a few of the recommended items that our server had suggested and to no fail, it was all GREAT!  Everything was a standout, but the Roasted Duck w/ kumquats, Hakka Noodles, Silver Cod with Champagne and the Strawberries with Champagne was my favorites! Will definitely go back when I'm in Vegas!  I'll need to try the rest of the menu!
1 This review is for the restaurant only. Please come here for dinner with a reservation if you would like to be treated like shit by both staff and management. In a town with hundreds of restaurants competing for business you would think they would consider customer service an important part of the customer experience. Especially since they are new here. We arrived this past Sunday evening at 9:32 PM for our 9:15 reservation for two people. Yes, we were late by 17 minutes.  Hostess: Can I help you? Me: Yes, reservation for David. Hostess: What time? Me: 9:15 Hostess: This reservation was cancelled after 15 minutes because you did not arrive on time.  Me: OK, can we be seated still? Hostess: I don't have anything. Just a moment. At this point my wife says to me "let's go".  I take a walk back into the restaurant and see that about 25% of the tables are empty. This is a Sunday night at 9:30PM.  I come back and the hostess ignores me. I tell my wife that the hostess is a bitch and we should probably just go. We leave.  As we enter the MGM casino a man starts yelling my name out loud. He chases us down and says he's the manager and asks why I called his hostess a bitch. Instead of being concerned that we are leaving without ever experiencing their restaurant he takes my private conversation with my wife and accuses me of calling their hostess a bitch. I would never do that and told him so. He continued to ask why I bothered his hostess. Very unprofessional, very harassing, we walked away and told him we were treated poorly and would be sharing our experience on YELP!  My wife's first intuition was to leave. I thought we would give them a chance to seat us but I was wrong. As usual my wife was correct.
5 Came here on the weekend to see Bingo Players perform! The place opened up recently so it was all brand spanking new. The decor was more chic and modern than the other older clubs which was nice to see. What caught my eye were the intense laser thing they had going on above the dance floor. With the crazy lasers and the dancers looking like something from a cirque du soleil  show, it reminded me of a rave.   The place was pretty crowded but we got bottle service at the top floor which was amazing. We had a table right at the middle so we overlooked the whole dance floor and had the dancers across from us with the lasers going crazy between us and the crowd on the main dance floor. The top floor was very spacious and although we had a large group, we had plenty of room to sit around comfortably or to dance. The top floor was much less packed and had a bathroom which not as many people were using which was also nice.   The experience was much better since we had bottle service though. It did look quite packed on the dance floor downstairs so maybe it would have been different if we just went in with general admission.
5 Everything about this place is impressive. Sexy décor, welcoming staff, friendly bartenders, I couldn't wait to be seated at our table for dinner. While waiting for my party to arrive, I got the Bird's Eye Margarita. Chili infused mescal with agave, lime and spicy bitters...YUM. If you like your drinks with an inferno element to it, I definitely recommend this guy. My friends and I ordered quite a bit from the menu, starting off with the Vegetarian Dim Sum for the non-meat eater at our table. I only sampled the Truffle Beancurd Roll, I was very smitten by the depth of flavor from the earthy truffle. The Seared Scallops were cooked perfectly and the sweet mango and spicy chili sauce played nicely off the tongue. Our last app of Fried Soft Shell Crab with Curry Leaf and Chili was finely chopped. It was nice not having to pick apart a whole crab to get through this dish. While we were waiting for the main dishes to arrive, our sommelier picked out an exquisite bottle of Sancerre that was an excellent match to our meal. We decided to try the Pak Choi with Salted Fish off the veggie portion of the menu, it was good but didn't blow me away. Our server highly recommended the Roasted Silver Cod with Champagne and Honey. This dish was impeccable and the subtle flavors of champagne and honey were a consummate match with the cod, definitely a winner in my book. I wanted to try the Peking duck with the Russian caviar but the price point was a little too much. So we opted for the Crispy Roast Duck with Kumquats and Mustard Sauce. I have a thing for sour fruits so the kumquats in this dish made me very happy. All the noodle options sounded a bit decadent so we went with the simple Hakka Noodles with Mushrooms and Chives. We decided to end our meal on a high note with the Vanilla Panna Cotta with Strawberries, Rhubarb + a light Champagne foam. The dessert was served in a terranium type glass, I found myself just staring at the crystal like bubble not wanting to disturb this beautiful work of art. This sweet treat was very refreshing, I loved the creaminess of the panna cotta with the strawberries and rhubarb. Wow I can honestly say that this meal was the highlight of our trip. The food here is beyond spectacular and the service is pretty stellar as well. Please open the LA Hakkasan soon :)!
3 The food is Good But way too expensive for what you get.    Essentially, this place serves elevated Chinese food.  They make what seem to be traditional Chinese dishes with elevated ingredients.   It sounds great, but I am not sure it was that much more amazing than what we would have gotten at our favorite Chinese restaurant back home.   Our final bill for two came out to $170 with tip, and back home a similar meal would have been $45 at most.   And to put it into perspective, we didn't order any of the more expensive items.   We got a  Beef Dish, A chicken dish, and an appetizer and a desert.  All the dishes were good.    I can understand that better ingredients warrant a higher price but this was a bit much.  If the prices were more reasonable, I would have given it a higher rating..       I will admit that the service was amazing.  There were multiple servers all concerned with every aspect of the meal.  The decor was amazing, it almost seemed like a cirque du soleil Set.
5 I had a really fun dinner here on Saturday night with four girlfriends. This is the perfect spot for dinner before a night out. We shared several things but the highlights were the seabass, the vegetarian dim sum, the sweet and spicy lobster and the chive noodles. Skip the truffle duck. It was a huge disappointment.   Cocktails were sweet and strong and the wine we ordered was great. Our server, Brian, was excellent. The macaroons were surprisingly good, albeit a bit random for a Chinese restaurant.   After dinner head to the lounge and then the club. Sure to make for a great Vegas evening!
3 I tried Hakkasan Vegas for the first time last Friday (6/21/13) and was a bit underwhelmed. The entrance to the restaurant is somewhat odd as it is right next to the nightclub entrance - with hoards of people lined up waiting to party, it doesn't feel very welcoming as a restaurant. When we made it inside, the hostesses were really nice. We had arrived early so we had a few drinks at the bar while we waited.  The bar is arranged pretty terribly. It is a tiny bar against the back wall probably big enough for about 10 crowded stools. Considering the number of people who probably have a drink while waiting to eat, they should have made it more spacious. The drinks, on the other hand, were a standout. We tried quite a few of the specialty cocktails and all were absolutely delicious!! (Be prepared that they are quite pricey.)  The layout of the restaurant itself is also odd. It felt like being inside of a bento box! Sets of a few tables were cordoned off with high walls so that you felt like you were walking through a maze to get to your table. I'm sure they did it to give it an intimate feel, but it took away from the high-energy club feel which I actually went there hoping for.  The food was pretty good - I give it a solid three stars. Had I not known the chef who started it had a Michelin star at his other place, I would have been pleasantly surprised by how good it was and probably given four stars. However, I went in hoping for food that was more innovative and special. Still, everything was tasty and we were really happy! We sampled 9 items from the menu (plus dessert), and the crispy duck salad appetizer was my absolute favorite.  I enjoyed it, but wouldn't be the one to suggest going back.
4 It was a great meal, with awesome service.  For a drink make sure you get the Hakka.  Loved the fact that we were escorted up the back to the nightclub instead of having to go outside.  I still prefer the Miami location though.
5 I went to Hakkasan with a friend so we could check out the restaurant. The decor and ambiance was fabulous. Definitely unlike any other restaurant I've seen in Vegas. The food, while relatively small in portions, was quite tasty, and the service was excellent.
3 3.68991234 stars.  I have some serious personal issues with spending as much as I did on Chinese food for 2.  I just imagine my Taiwanese mother looking at this menu and freaking over things like $18 stir fried noodles (with no meat nonetheless) and $28 for essentially 8 dumplings (albeit very good ones) .  But alas...happy wife, happy life!  She really enjoyed the dinner and preferred this over Tao.  I disagree.    Don't get me wrong.  There were a couple of excellent dishes but it's simply the principle of paying this much for it that endlessly irks me.  So let's start with those:  OUTSTANDING DISHES:  Crispy Duck Salad:  My Hakkasan host recommended this dish to me a week before.  The server said it was her favorite thing on the menu.  Who am I to argue?  It was the best thing we had.  The duck was cooked perfectly and combining it with greens, pomegranate, pomelo and pine nuts made for a super tasty dish.  I am pretty sure I will order this every time I dine here.  It won't be many more unless I am getting comped but this is a MUST HAVE.    Stir-fried Black Pepper Beef Ribeye with Merlot:  Love Me Tender.  Tender is the night.  Tender Love.  Time, Love and Tenderness.  Tenderoni.  I would've included "Try a Little Tenderness" but there was nothing little about this.  It was A LOT of tenderness.  Every freakin morsel was juicy and delectable.  I also liked that they included big pieces of garlic mixed in.  To fully enjoy this dish, you should order a side of jasmine rice for $2.    DECENT:  Hakka Steamed Dim Sum Platter:  I won't go into the names of them all but there was shrimp, fish, scallop and duck.  The fish was ground up and then secured in a black squid ink wrap.  The scallop had a little ikura on top which was a nice touch.  I chose to eat the majority of these dumplings straight without sauce to get the full taste of it.  They offered 3 sauces with them but vinegar would have been nice as Yelper Cynthia C. mentioned in her review.  The cocktails were also decent but I forget the names of them.  DON'T EVEN BOTHER:  To sum it up, go for the stuff you can't get in a regular above average Chinese restaurant.   Four Style Vegetable in sweet Szechuan sauce:  I didn't plan on ordering this but the server recommended it.  We had also been eating a little more unhealthy than usual that week so both of us thought a few veggies would help.  This was a joke.  The sweet and spice didn't work and the medley of asparagus, shimeji mushroom, yam bean (had the consistency of apple) and tofu was weird for me.    Hakka noodle with mushrooms and Chinese chive: I was recommended this dish before coming and I got it even though I was still skeptical.  This would've been good if it were $5 but not $18.    The food wasn't the only thing going on here.  I liked how the tables were sectioned off to handle small and larger parties.  The atmosphere was pretty chill at the time we were there (7pm Saturday) but I imagine it might get a little more rockin later in the evening.  The service was surprisingly excellent and our main server was incredibly nice.  They also offered some tasting courses that looked pretty interesting but you had to have a minimum of 4 to do it.    I don't regret coming here but there are a lot of better options at this price point in the MGM like Craftsteak.
5 The restaurant ambiance is a four. The food is a five. The cocktails are a five. Our waitress was an 11.
5 WAY better than the club.. given the restaurant is definitely on the pricer side.. I'd say if you put aside the prices probably the best asian fusion i've had.. (better than mission chinese, geisha house, and the usual suspects)   Try to Hakka Noodles, duck salad, beef rib chunks, all of which were amazing! Service was very attentive and knowing that I was hungry.. they rushed orders and didn't make us wait like every other fancier restaurant.  OH yea!! foie gras shrimp balls... omg... wish they had more foie gras.. but still to DIE for   Also make sure to try their exotic fruit platter.
5 This is a damn good restaurant, I can see where all the hype comes from.  Multiple people in past months have told me that Hakkasan serves some of the best food they have ever had, I had a hard time believing that until yesterday.  The food is exceptional.  My fear was that the plates were going to be small and that I would have to order a lot to get full, but quite honestly, as long as you order one small and one large entree, you should be fine.  Highlights for me (carnivore) were the duck salad and the rib eye entree.  Good lord, the duck salad does not look very appetizing when it first comes out, but oh my it was good.  It almost looks like the duck is on a bed of dry grass (looks strange), but do not worry, for a party is about to start in your mouth!!  Clean pieces of crispy duck accompanied with those greens (not really sure what kind they were) with fruit like pomegranate.  The salad was lightly dressed, didn't need help with much of a heavy dressing.  Simple, clean flavors, wow!  The rib eye, I have never had rib eye this tender in my whole life.  I need to learn how they prepare it, very exceptional dish.    Cocktails done right!  I suggest the Broken Promise if you are into bourbon.  Happy dining!!
2 When you first arrive, the line for the restaurant is far left from all the clubs' lines. Once my group of six arrived, we went up to the hostess earlier than our scheduled reservation. Unfortunately, we were not seated until almost an hour after while we had to wait for a table along with other groups who had arrived on time as well. You may get a free drink at the bar if they know your waiting but other than that you are waiting in a small space with no chairs where all the workers are scurrying through. Once you are seated it is very hard to get someone to recognize you're there. At least three times did someone from our table have to retrieve the server. We all ordered the pre-fixed menu and if you want to take the dessert home forget it. They said it's specially made and cannot fit in a take out box. What that means I do not know. The food is very good just not worth their prices but it is Las Vegas. We had tickets to see Tiesto that night and you do not have to wait in line if you're coming from dinner. However, The servers and hosts are not on the same page about who exactly takes the group to the club area making you go back and forth.   In the end I could go to Vegas a million more times and not care to comehere again.
4 My husband and I were in Vegas last weekend and loved our dinner experience at Hakkasan. Believe me, I came in to the experience with my guard up, thinking that the food would be average at best, with all the hype just because of the big name DJs. I was totally wrong. We had a drink at the bar before we got seated and, as you might, expect, there was a great vibe going on. Really tasty cocktails on the menu at typical Vegas prices. We got seated very close to our reservation time and our waitress was a totaly sweetheart. No attitude, nor did she rush us. I can't really remember exactly what we ate, but all of it was amazing, especially the dim sum appetizer. I would absolutely go back to Hakkasan and would like to check it out in another city.
2 Food is nothing special - if one paid $7 a dish, it would be OK. But at $30 a dish - hardly a great experience. Loud music, late seating - had to wait 40 mins despite having a reservation....not to mention the small tables where one has to sit half way out ...
5 Rave reviews about the London location led me to Hakkasan for my birthday dinner, and it did not disappoint. The best word to describe the hip night club/ Asian fusion restaurant is SUAVE. Dim blue lights illuminate the modern Asian decor that surrounds you while highly trained (and fully clothed--a rarity in Vegas) staff serve you cocktails, dinner, and deserts that are to die for! This was hands down the best Asian fusion meal I have ever had, and I cannot wait to go back.  Highlights: - Pink Mojito - Quail appetizer - Roasted Duck - Seared Scallops
5 This place is amazing! Their dim sum, duck salad, and basically everything is super delicious! Its a must try! Also the waitress was very knowledgeable and friendly!
4 London-based Hakkasan first appeared strong on my radar when it opened in San Francisco late last year. I had heard great reviews but just couldn't fit it in while I was up there during Christmas. That location was the tenth in the worldwide chain, known for its high-end Chinese cuisine; in fact, two of its locations (NYC and London) have garnered Michelin stars, a relative rarity for a Chinese restaurant. Hakkasan's eleventh location marks its biggest splash of all, with a $100 million, 5-floor, 75,000 square-foot restaurant/nightclub. Literally and figuratively, it's Las Vegas' biggest opening this year.  Our meal began with a colorful lineup of cocktails - two alcoholic and two non-alcoholic (pictured left to right).  Eden black grapes, rose sugar, lychee juice, soda water The Chinese Mule ketel one vodka, masumi junmai sake, cilantro, ginger, lime, ginger beer The Hakka belvedere vodka, masumi okuden junmai sake, coconut, passion fruit, lychee juice Mandarine Sunshine kumquats, apple, ginger, fever-tree ginger ale  We each enjoyed our drinks. I had the Chinese mule, their Asian twist on the classic. I thoroughly enjoy cocktails with savory ingredients, and this was no exception.  As with many Chinese restaurants, the menu at Hakkasan is fairly vast. We picked out one item from each section of the menu focusing in on the house specialties (signified by the Hakkasan logo).  Salt and Pepper Squid - The salt and pepper squid was a relatively simple dish not unlike one you'd get at a typical Chinese restaurant. Tender squid was covered in a crispy batter with much of the flavor coming from fried chilies and shallots. Whereas I find this dish to be somewhat inconsistently prepared across restaurants, this one was well-executed.  Crispy Duck Salad with pomegranate, pine nut and shallot - The server highly recommended this, spending a good five minutes selling us on it. The duck was pretty tasty, with a crispy skin that held up with the lightly dressed salad. A little bit of pomegranate seeds and fried lotus root added some additional texture. We all thought this was a great, well-balanced dish.  Roasted Chilean Sea Bass with Chinese honey - This was one of the best dishes of the evening, a succulent piece of fish roasted in honey. The earthiness and texture of fried mushrooms was the main accompaniment, but the real star was the rich, moist fish.  Pipa Duck - This was another highlight, simple but very well done. Thin strips of sweet duck were served with its own crisp skin. I think some of the fat was trimmed, leaving a nice balance of meat-fat-skin in these delicious pieces.  Stir-Fry Black Pepper Beef Ribeye with Merlot - The beef here was very tender, similar to a tenderloin in texture. A savory sauce didn't add a ton of flavor to the meat, but they were tasty chunks of meat nonetheless. Note to self: the woven fried noodle 'basket' isn't really edible.  Three-Style Mushroom Stir-Fry with macadamia nut, gai lan stalks and water chestnut - This dish was more interesting texturally than flavor-wise. Assorted chewy mushrooms and crunchy stalks of gai lan made for some lighter bites in between the meat and fish.  French Beans with minced pork and dried shrimp - Dried shrimp and a porky flavor stood out with these beans, cooked just enough to be tender with a firm snap to them. A very nice side dish.  Hakka Noodle with mushrooms and Chinese chives - Our primary starch component, in addition to Jasmine rice, was this dish of stir fried noodles. They were good with a light spice, though altogether unspectacular.  Upon completion of the savory dishes, we ordered a trio of sweet ones.  'PB&J' peanut butter parfait, sour cherry jam, banana and passion fruit sorbet Chocolate and Black Sesame Cremeux sesame florentine, yuzu ice cream Strawberries & Champagne vanilla panna cotta, organic strawberries, rhubarb, Champagne foam  Each of these were beautifully plated. My brother got the PB&J, featuring rich peanut butter and sour cherry flavors, complemented by passion fruit sorbet. My dad opted for the chocolate and black sesame dessert, with creamy flavors accented by a bright yuzu ice cream. My mother went lighter with the vanilla panna cotta topped with Harry's Berries strawberries, an interesting Champagne foam, and a crumble for texture. And me? I just got an extra spoon to sample each. My favorite was the last one.  The food was as beautiful as the decor, and just about everything was pretty tasty. The cuisine primarily stays true to traditional Chinese, not moving towards more Western fusion influences that a lot of other high-end Asian restaurants do. As a result, the food felt very comfortable in a way; but make no mistake, it was also significantly more refined than the average Chinese restaurant (and the prices reflect that).
4 We were really looking forward to our visit and enjoyed our meal. Best thing about the place is the vibe...loud and "clubby"...would be a great place for a group. Food was great (should be for the price!!). Duck salad is a MUST...we also had the merlot beef and hakka noodles...both were pretty good, but nothing super special, Lemon chicken was also tasty, but sauce was very sweet. Drink menu was super creative. We had the Broken Promise bourbon cocktail and Saffron Poire. Saffron flavor was amazing but the drink was so rich I could only drink a few sips.   Great spot, four stars for the overall experience and especially the ambience.
5 We selected this place because we had tickets to see the DJ upstairs for later that evening. Great restaurant! Decor and atmosphere are awesome. We enjoyed more cocktails upstairs before heading into see Tiesto at the club. Overall a wonderful experience! If you go up to the lounge - see the bartender named Barrie. She's super friendly and a great person to chat with! Also makes a great Hakka!  Had:  Stir-fry mushroom lettuce wrap - delicious! Wok-fry New Zealand lamb chop with XO BBQ sauce - very good Roast chicken with satay sauce - again delicous! Hakka noodle with mushrooms and Chinese chive V - cooked perfectly! Strawberries & Champagne - great panna cota!   Drank: The Hakka and the Green Destiny - BOTH ARE SUPERB - preferred the Green Destiny because of it's sweetness and the Bison Grass Vodka.
3 While people will swear to this cuisine's authenticity, it feels a bit overhyped. Almost like they're trying too hard. The flavor is there, but the techniques feel very Americanized. The portion/dish sizes are also very small for the price you pay. Depending on your party size and appetite, you could be looking at 1.5-2 dishes per person.  The menu is inspired by Cantonese and Szechuan cuisines, but feels more fusion than anything else. Don't get me wrong; you'll find some legit dishes here. But most of them have been adjusted for the American palette.  There's also a DJ bumping club hits so I couldn't help but bounce my head all throughout dinner...
5 OMG. So good! Start out with the Hakka, their signature cocktail.  We got the steamed Dim Sum, the scallops, the truffle noodles and the crispy duck rolls. Impeccable service, great ambiance and so yummy!
3 We only chose to go here because when you eat there your club entry is free and you don't have to wait in line. So we figured why not kill 2 birds with 1 stone? Mehh the food was average I wasn't very impressed. We asked the waiter if we could exempt the fish out of the chicken and fish stir fry and he said no it's not possible it comes that way. Huh? So you mean my stir fry rice is coming in a  pre-made bag? That's gross. The only other option for stir fry rice was eggs and scallions so we opted for the white rice. Order 2 bowls per person- one was definitely not enough, unless you're fancy and enjoy those super small portions. We ordered the crispy quail- pretty good. Lemon chicken- bland. And the sweet and sour pork- good! I also ordered a Green Destiny- amazing. I'm a smoothie drinker on the regular so those veggie fruit tasting drinks are right up my ally.
3 Boyfriend and I wanted something special, so when we saw that Hakkasan was located in the hotel we were staying at, we decided to try it out. Based on reviews, we tried their famous Duck salad with pomegranate, pine nuts, and sprouts The braised duck was super tender, but overly salty because of the sauce, but the pomegranate and pine nuts was a nice touch to the salad. The next option was the deep fried scallops with chili mango sauce which ended up being the only star dish of the night. You get a slight crispy outside with perfectly cooked scallops and the sauce was sweet and spicy. Boyfriend ordered the signature Hakkasan cocktail and that ended up being very delicious, so I would recommend it. Third dish was the pea sprouts and crab sauce which was very bland and didn't live up to it's hype. The crab sauce lacked flavor, so imagine a bland sauce on top of bland vegetables, it wasn't worth the price. The 4th dish received mixed reviews, we loved the tender and juicy fillet tenderloin, but we weren't impressed with how extremely salty it was. Supposedly their intent was to create an edible fried funnel cake like garnish under the tenderloin, but the batter was bland, hard, and inedible. When we told our server, he didn't even do anything about it or apologize! For the price we were paying, I expected better quality and service. To us, these dishes are described in an exotic way; however, if you really think about it, these are just typical Asian dishes that you can make at home. Overall, we were very disappointed with our food adventure and will only return for the scallops and drinks.
2 i hate paying a lot for mediocre chinese food.  we came w/ a group of about 18, so we had to get the prix fixe menu for $118.  the portions were sooo small, and i was barely full.    for apps, we had the fried dim sum sampler, short ribs and scallops.  there was basically one rib to share and then one scallop for each person.  the dim sum were pretty good.  the entrees were even smaller.  the prawns in claypot consisted mainly of onions, and there was not even a prawn for each person.  the duck was the thinnest, least meaty duck i've ever had.  the seabass was by far the best dish, but i wish there was more of it.  the beef was good, but it was like one piece of steak for 5 people to share.  the only dish that came in abundance was the fried rice, which was more like white rice w/ some salt on it.  there were 2 desserts, a coconut pudding w/ caramelized pineapple and a choc thing which looked like a kit kat bar.  again...small.    after drinks, tax and tip, it was $200 a person.  what a ripoff.  flavors were fine, hence more than 1 star, but i would never go back.
4 Hubby took me there for my birthday last weekend and it was wonderful. Decor and ambience get full marks. The place has a young, trendy vibe. Music is loud so do not expect to have an intimate conversation. The food was excellent. Well cooked and well presented. I take umbrage at people who say the portions are small, The Cheesecake Factory this is not! People are so used to massive quantities of poor quality food that they fail to recognize a good thing when they see it. I'm not saying the place isnt pricey, it is. But the quality of food makes up for it. And the portions are just right for an individual. You dont leave the table feeling stuffed and that's how it should be. The one star I have taken off is for the dessert. It was hugely underwhelming. I ordered the Strawberries and Cream Champagne with high expectations. Dessert is a very important part of the meal and this was a huge let-down for me. I barely got through a fourth of it. The strawberries were sour, the pannacotta tasteless and the dry biscuit powder was, well, dry powder. All of this thrown carelessly in a glass was not appealing on any level.  Drinks -I tried all their bellinis (3 flavours) and guava was my favourite. Main course -  My husband had a roasted duck in honey-mustard that was to die for.
3 Having heard about Hakkasan from friends in London and Hong Kong, I was excited to dine at the restaurant with my friends. As a vegetarian, I was impressed not only by the large variety of vegetarian options at the restaurant, but also by the relative authentic flavor of the dishes. Without doubt, Hakkasan is a restaurant that is friendly to both vegetarians and carnivores.   All my friends agreed the soup in Hakkasan are authentic and well executed, and they highly recommend the soup to Yelpers. Their favorites are chicken soup and the lobster soup. The former composes of red dates, black chicken and several Chinese medicine ingredients. According to one of my friends, she never had this soup outside of China, and was impressed by Hakkasan's effort in creating this dish. Another friend of mine also greatly enjoyed the lobster soup, which had lobster, tofu and mushroom. In her perspective, the mushroom enhances the flavor, while the tofu complexes the textures.   For vegetarian Yelpers, I recommend the mushroom lettuce wrap, which is a refreshing alternative to the tofu lettuce wrap. While the pine nuts increases the texture of the dish, I suggest the chef increasing the ratio of mushroom to pine nuts in order to further enhance the flavor. I appreciate the waitress promptly refiling the lettuce for me.   The vegetarian dim sum platter is a beautifully decorated dish that I would suggest sharing amongst friends. Although each dim sum was well executed, it tasted very similar to each other. All the dim sum were mainly composed of mushroom and used similar sauce. I recommend the chef increasing the variety of ingredients and sauce for the dim sum platter.   While my friends and I greatly enjoyed the food at Hakkasan, we recommend the manager to provide more training to the waitresses. Our waitress was attentive, but she did not seem to know the menu well and asked my friend repeatedly where she saw fresh lemonade as a drink. As the lemonade was advertised as fresh, I hope Hakkasan will provide fresh juice instead of the sparkling lemonade in the future.   I recommend Hakkasan to friends and couples, who are looking for a Chinese restaurant with well-executed food and a hip vibe.  Tip for Yelpers: You can stop by the reception of the restaurant to make reservations throughout the day, if you are not able to reach the hostess via phone.
4 The only reason I can't give this place 5 stars is I thought the food was extremely overpriced --even for a nice place like Hakkasan-- especially the dim sum (which was one of the very few dishes that didn't taste great). Otherwise, most everything on that menu was REALLY, REALLY GOOOOOD--and I don't even like Chinese food! :P  Standouts include tofu & eggplant claypot, duck salad, and roasted silver cod with Champagne and Chinese honey. That silver cod was the group's favorite.  As for cocktails, the Hakka is to die for! It's sweet and strong! I loved it!  Service is excellent!!! THEY WILL EVEN CHARGE YOUR CELLPHONE WHILE YOU EAT!   Can't say I will be back because there are better tasting Chinese restaurants in Vegas (like at the Wynn and Encore). However, dining at Hakkasan and heading over for a little Calvin Harris action is an experience in and of itself. So, for me, it's a "maybe" I will be back for food.
5 Okay, people... I am reading a lot of complaining about the serving size and cost! First of all, the service is awesome.  They will do just about anything to make sure you are enjoying your visit. The food is excellent, every dish has it's own flavor and is served in gourmet fashion.  Eating here is an experience. The drinks are wonderfully crafted.  Now, of course you don't want to spend a fortune.  Good food is good food and if you want excellence and elegance you pay for it.  If you can't afford it, go to P.F. Chang's and enjoy your bill...
3 Went to Hakkasan Labor Day weekend on a Saturday night, it was not crazy busy and we were seated right away, group of 8 of us.  The food was good and so were the drinks, the inside atmosphere is very nice, dim lighting and not too congested.  Tables are separate from each other so you are not sitting on top of one another.  We ordered a ton of dishes and ate them all up!!! I would give it 5 stars but when it comes to Asian Fusion nothing beats Zuma Miami so my 5 stars are saved for Zuma!  After dinner we headed up to the lounge had some more drinks and called it a night.  The drinks at the lounge are pricey but it is Las Vegas and I'm used to the prices since Chicago is not any better.  I would recommend going to Hakkasan and trying it out!
2 Drinks were unique and delicious, but like everything in Vegas, wildly overpriced.  The food was not memorable at all. As we were eating, we agreed that the high ratings must come from people who enjoyed the atmosphere, which was nice.  We tried 5 or 6 dishes, including the famous duck salad. None of them were worth repeating.   Tasty drinks and great service, but food is grossly underwhelming.
5 Again, an amazing dinner!   We've dinned here last may and a few days ago. Both experiences met our expectations.  The great service starts at the moment your reservation is made. Not only asking for the occassion, but also inquiring for any special preferences and allergies.  I can't remember what we ate last may, so I'll focus on the last visit (this week). From last may I only remember that my love had something with duck (of course, he always does) and we had a nice Viognier. And, the server accidentally brought us a wrong dish. Not knowing what we could expect we started eating thinking it was the right dish. The waitress noticed it and made sure we also had the dish we ordered. Quickly. And the wrongly served dish was not charged. Nice way to make up for mistakes.  So, this week, party of three. We decided to share 2 appetizers, take 3 entrees and a side dish. But, between deciding that and determining what to take.......Pff..The Hakkasan has a very extensive menu and we had different wishes (yes/no to fish, yes/no bones) and my culinary English is (I think) pretty good but there parts of the menu that weren't completely clear like har gau. But this was no problem for the waitress, she took al the time to help me enhance my vocabulary. Finally we orderded the short ribs and the dim sum as appetizers. Bot excellent. The only thing that can be remarked is that the staff takes the meat from the bone at the table. That didn't look very professionel. They should start with given the waitresses a little bit more of practice and a sharper knife (the lady used standerd, not very sharp cutlery). I really feared that it whould end up on my dress..........  We had the Pipa Duck, the Shanghai lamb tenderloin and the beef with Merlot as entrees and the Udon Noodles with duck as a side. All entrees were excellent. Nicely presented and a normal portion. Only the pipa was not that much. We all agreed that we liked the beef with Merlot most of all. very tender meat, nicely seasoned. The pipa duck was as remarked, a very small portion. Excellent flavours, but because it resembles Peking Duck so much I think we will not order that again. The Shangai lamb was also good, altough some peoplie might think it's a little hot. One member of the party suggested a Pinot Grigio as a wine to start with. We ended up choosing one from Italy and drinking this with the entire meal.  We skipped desserts, because I remembed from last may that once you eaten real European style macarons (La Duree....to die for) American's macarons just don't match up. Not chewy enough, not enough 'macaron-blood' in their veins ;). So we just ordered coffee (and a cointreau). This was the only dissapointment of the evening. Don't order coffee. My love send his cappucino back the first time and yes, it was better the second time around, but not what you'll expect after the amazing dishes. Same thing applied for the lattes.  Sure, this luxery doesn't come cheap. But I rather pay a little bit more for a nice ambience, good service and excellent food than just fill my stomach. And if you're a little aware of the prices you can have an excellent dinner for an fair price. We ended up with a check of $330 (including gratuity) for 3 persons. Not too bad.   (Note: I'm no native speaker so please excuse all grammar and spelling mistakes).
5 Had fish. Definitely recommend the grouper. Not a huge portion and very well presented and the flavor was just right. Service as expected was excellent. If you eat at the restaurant you can go straight to the club. A perfect end to a weekend night.
4 The service was impeccable. It was 6 nurses in town for a conference and our server Caitlin answered all our questions and helped us decide on our meals. The sea bass and the pork belly in a clay pot were amazing. The Hakka cocktail and lychee martini were favorites. I know people complain about the price, but the quality of the food is worth it.
5 Ummm ...seriously it will probably take me a few hours just to start this review as I am still in a food coma from Friday night when we all dined at Hakkasan.  We made a reservation and were seated immediately, cha-ching. We were all overwhelmed with the menu as honestly EVERYTHING looked spectacular. At the recommendation of our waiter as well as a friend, we ordered:  * duck salad - umm yeah so when our friend said "oh you guys should try this" we were all like mmm yeah...duck...about that.... None were interested to try this at all. I am NOT a fan of duck...not just like the polite "oh no thank you" but the like "get that away from me". When it arrived, I was looking over like "should I try it? What do I do?" Everyone else was eating it. I'm supposed to be the foodie over here...Ahh. So I caved. I went for it. Wait for it...wait for it...  Hi, I'm Melanie and I now like duck. The flavors all blended together so smoothly that no wonder this is one of their signature dishes. It's scrumptious! A must order. All of us enjoyed it (rare, but then again, it was in a salad, and my friends on the trip only ate salads...women!). I was all like "let's get the fried dumplings" and they're all like "mmm what about a salad?" NO! We are on a vacation and so dumplings we ate...with the salad of course.  * hakka steamed dim sum platter - MMMM especially the one with the scallop! AHHH I wanted to order 100 of these.   * shanghai dumpling (which I asked them to make steamed rather than fried and they honored this request) - the dipping sauce was out of this world as were the dumplings themselves. I LOVE dumplings...like if there was a word that described love multiplied by 564376724724 to infinity and beyond, I would use that to describe my feelings toward dumplings. It's a sick obsession. Therefore, I have very strict standards of what a dumpling should taste like. Trust me on this one, these dumplings passed the test. I am still dreaming of them.  * stir-fry udon noodle with shredded duck and XO sauce (I switched the duck for shrimp which again they honored) this thing was like 12 buck$. If anyone can complain in a Yelp review on here about price and portion size, please don't ever dine at a fine dining restaurant ever again. This portion was bigger than a regular full-size dinner portion and yet was listed on the "sides" menu. It was more than satisfying and honestly if I just had this in itself, I would have probably been full. So it honestly ALL depends what you order and you have to pretty much get a sense of the menu to see what the bigger portions will be (or simply just ask).   * steamed red snapper in spicy assam sauce - holy moly. Flavor order-load. You just have to experience it for yourself. Seriously. Do it.  * cod...yeah I'm just going to put cod because I can't remember which damn one we got (ugh, what a Yelper I am). Take a gamble on this one folks, you have a 50/50 chance of eating what we ate (although I'm sure the other cod dish is equally as good).  * fruit plate....yes as we were adjusting our belts (from all the food) and getting ready for a night filled with laughter and cocktails and all that heartfelt butterfly crap (aka a night on the town in Vegas), then the fruit plate came. It was like a scene out of jaws, you know the "dun dun, dun dun" music was playing in our ears and there it was...almost half the size of my entire body. Ok no, but you get the point. It was huge and SO well presented. I seriously did not want to eat it!!! But we did...and it was like we were so full we were about to burst and just couldn't stop eating it...I don't know what else they put in this fruit place besides, well fruit, but yuuuuuuuum! Fruit never tasted so good.  With such an extensive menu, of course you are going to have a huge range of things to order and various prices that go along with the various dishes. If you want to dine on a budget, order one main course and maybe 2 sides. There ya go and now stop complaining, geez. You can find things on the menu that are EXTREMELY expensive...if you are on a budget, here's a tip, don't order it. There are reasonable things as well. However, I wouldn't suggest dining at Hakkasan on a strict budget as you really should order many dishes to get the full experience (but it can be done).   AMBIANCE. You just have to check it out for yourself...let's just say: amazing.   This was definitely a meal to remember and definitely the next time we come back, our first stop will be Hakkasan.
4 After hearing much about Hakkasan, and how, in terms of popularity and atmosphere it's "the new Tao," we made reservations and checked it out.  We booked over a week in advance, and the earliest reservations we were able to get at Hakkasan were 10:30pm, but in Vegas, who cares!  The interior decor in Hakkasan was awesome, it was dark, but had a cool feeling.  Attention to detail was great, including the dragons embroidered on the cushions of the booths.   Between 4 of us (who weren't very hungry), we ordered the crispy duck salad, Hakka steamed dim sum platter, Hakka noodle with mushrooms and Chinese chives, lamb, and braised pork belly clay pot.  All of the dishes were very good, and I would likely order them again.  The portions were perfect for sharing for 4 people, there was enough for everyone to have a taste of everything, and then some.  Standout dishes included the pork belly and the crispy duck.  Not too healthy, but super delicious!  The prices were a bit high, but the quality was great, the portions were definitely sufficient, and I think if you were on a budget, you could easily eat for $50/person, which in my opinion is definitely worth it for the Hakkasan experience!  I still don't think Hakkasan is as nice as Tao, I like Tao's atmosphere and menu much better, but it's nice to have the choice of Tao and Hakkasan at either end of the strip!
3 Be prepared to spend a lot of money here.   The Crispy Duck Salad was good but I'm not sure how it's worth $28. Service was a bit slow and our server was absent for 15 minutes while we were ready to cash out and leave. I like the idea of family style Asian fusion and sharing plates, so there's one benefit.   Probably won't be back here anytime soon.
5 Asian place inside of the MGM. Went with a large group, so we had everything family style. Dumpling assortment (excellent), abalone (very good), and duck salad (very good) for appetizer. Mains were lobster sweet and sour (subpar compared to the rest of the meal), some kind of cod (very good), wagyu beef (good), sliced duck breast (excellent) and green beans with pork (good), along with fried rice (OK). Service was excellent and the ambiance was cool. Not cheap though, with some booze it was about $300 a head, but worth it when someone else is paying.
4 Service is good, food not so much. Drinks are too big and sweet! Don't try the lycée vodka drink. It's very private and dark. Good for meetings or private events. Not a good place to people watch. Meh I probably wouldn't go back nothing too special. If you're going to hakkasan the club it's fun to go after the restaurant.
5 We went with high expectations, and we were not disappointed.  If you are seeking a fabulous and trendy atmosphere, this is the place.  Decor is very chic, and the music playing in the background is just at the right volume.  While this is a large room, Asian screen style dividers give the illusion of many small rooms, almost a maze.  Very cool.  The service was wonderful, however the food was the best part.  We sampled 3 or 4 small plates and the same in entrees.  All were great, but the Duck Salad and the Chilean Sea Bass with honey were our favorites.  We will definitely go back.
4 GEE GOLLY! He is SO good!! Dinner date?? At Hakkasan?! YES PLEASE! I've heard great things about this restaurant... I can't wait to taste the hype!  Two other friends join us for a belated birthday dinner - it was great company and a great evening with great service.   This is what we ate!   Crispy Duck Salad with pomelo, pomegranate and pine nut: AMAAAZZZIIING!! I don't even like duck. EVER. Like i DISLIKE it. And this was SOOO damn gooooooooood!!! Holy shiet. It is a definitely MUST TRY!!   Sesame prawn toast with foie gras: This was VERY freakin' good! Just be careful! Do NOT bite directly into this prawn ball AND when cutting into ti also be careful because it will SQUIRT!!   Spicy prawn with lily bulb and almond: I loved the sauce with this dish! Nom nom! Just a hint of spicy heat. Loved it!   Stir-fry udon noodle with shredded duck and XO sauce: Again, i am not a duck fan but this duck stir fried in with the noodles wasn't bad at all.   Stir-fry black pepper beef ribeye with merlot: This was good. Rj super enjoyed it but it didn't really stand out to me.   Scallops: I was actually cravings scallops but I was not impressed with this dish. The flavor was aiiiight but I felt the scallops were a TINY bit overcooked and I think that makes quite a big difference!   Steamed red snapper in spicy assam sauce: This wasn't bad, but it didn't really stick out TOO much and it seemed kind of dry.   And this is what I drank!  The Hakka: Belvedere vodka, Masumi Okuden junmai sake, coconut, lime, passion fruit and lychee juice - It was GOOD but it was VERY sweet, The lychee was REALLY good.. Actually the whole drink tasted like Lychee... Later I switched to some Circoc Peach!   And this is what we had for dessert!  Chocolate & black sesame crémeux black sesame Florentine, yuzu ice cream; This was interesting. The chocolate was good and the sesame thing was kind of odd. Not at all your typical dessert!   Ice creams and sorbets: An assortment of three different flavors. I think one of them was like a mint greek yogurt and it was BLAH! I spit it out. Sorry I'm not sorry.   Macaroons: They brought out a little plate of these with a HAPPY BIRTHDAY sign for our friend Rj and a little candle. How sweet!   SO after all that... My FAVORITE items were the Crispy Duck Salad and the Prawn Toast... Am I gonna be knocking down the door to come back here asap?? No way... and Yeah still FOUR Stars because that damn duck salad and prawn toast!!!! SO BOMB.
5 Easily in my top 10 meals of all time. Sat at the bar and was in heaven eating dim sum and the crispy duck salad.
2 I was excited to dine here... Until I dined. Unfortunately, I was disappointed by the food--simply mediocre and along the same line of Chinese food I could get for $40 rather than $240. The dim sum was decent but the snapper was dry and the prawns and curry just didn't work for me. The nightclub, to add, felt like a cave and my party and I left shortly after being escorted in. I will say, however, service at the restaurant was excellent.
5 Everything was perfect from the decoration of the restaurant to the server and especially the food and drinks.   We tried the tasting menu which went to the Susan G. Komen foundation. It was $70 each. We had the dim sum platter and the lettuce wraps. The lettuce wraps were delish!! For our main course we had stir-fry lobster in XO sauce, spicy prawn, and stir-fry  black pepper ribeye. Our side dishes were pak choi and fried rice. Everything was excellent. The PB&J dessert was amazing! .    After dinner our server took us the lounge were we enjoyed some cocktails. Everyone was so friendly and helpful. Definitely going to come back again.
5 Hakkasan is cray. Cray good.   First, let's start with their cocktails. I am not a big drinker, so it was so nice and refreshing to see non-alcoholic cocktails on the menu.  The one called Eden was absolutely delicious -- rose, black grapes, lychee juice....yummmy. I think I am actually going to try to make it at home in LA myself.  I told the bartender to keep them coming (like, I said, cray. I was getting cray with the non-alcoholic cocktails, y'all).  Our dinner ended up being about 25 people, so I didn't order for myself. Someone ordered and I just ate..and ate....and ate...well, you get the picture.  The fried dim sum platter was excellent -- the duck was my favorite out of the dim sum.  Scallops in mango/chili sauce were also good, but I kept going back to the fried stuff.   As for veggies, we only ordered the sugar snaps, and I would have liked to try something else...like the lotus root, that looked amazing.  Sugar snaps were still good if you like sugar snaps. I mean, who doesn't?  The Wagyu beef was really incredible. If you aren't used to the heavy marbleization, then it may be a bit of a shock at first, but don't worry.  You'll love it. Delish.  My favorite meat was the black pepper ribeye in merlot....so so so good. A must try.  We had other dishes that I didn't even get to try because there was so much food on the table, but everyone was raving about every single dish, so I don't think you could go wrong.  As for dessert, the coconut pudding was pretty incredible.  We kept calling it paradise in a cup.  We also had the black sesame chocolate one, which was good, but the coconut pudding was better. Loved it.  Then we went to the club for bottle service. They walked us all the way in and made sure none of us got lost. I was really happy to have a place to sit because this place is crowded.  So fun and really what Vegas is all about --- amazing food and getting cray.
5 I stumbled upon this place while we are waiting for the Ka show in MGM grand. My wife thought it was a Japanese place just by looking at its name and I thought it was a night club by just looking at its facade. To me and my wife's great surprise, the menu says its an upscale Chinese restaurant and we decided to give it a try. It was the decor that draws us in and it was the food that truly amazes us. The decor itself is a piece of art. Inside of the restaurant resembles traditional Chinese courtyard style with Suzhou style windows and everything.    The menu items are fairly reasonable priced with dishes ranges from 20-50 dollars and they are all family style dishes. There is a section which they called Supreme dishes which is about 3 to 400 dollars per and they are mainly exotic seafood dishes.  My wife ordered the Chinese mushroom soup with wolfberry. You can smell the aroma of the mushroom and the soup is very fresh and light. We ordered the Tofu, aubergine and shiitake mushroom claypot in black bean sauce, Mongolian style beef tenderloin and Chicken and salted fish fried rice for our main courses. It was three on the best dishes we've had during our trip to Vegas. The beef tenderlion was VERY tender and juicy and the toufu just melts in your mouth.  The best part comes in the form of dessert: Coconut pudding. From its presentation to its taste, it was superb.
1 The service is probably the worst I have ever seen for such a popular restaurant.   So I take my customers there for a fun night of drinking and great food.  It was a disaster!!!  The waiter was very unprofessional and basically screwed up the drinks and apps and a few dinner selections!  The appetizers came out at the wrong time! The dinner was a joke because 1/3 of the party got there dinner with no sides.  30 mins later the sides come with another 1/3 of peoples dinners and one of my clients literally waited for a hour after everyone else had already eaten.  The worst part was that a few members of the dinner left before others even got there dinner because they were sick and tired of waiting.  Who can blame them!  Now let me tell you about the God awful food!  I think i have had better Chinese food at those neon light Chinese food for 99 cents lol.  The Mongolian beef was probably the nastiest food I ever tasted.  It was under cooked and just simply a low grade of food!  When I take out my customers usually I get thank you emails instead I had to write 10 emails saying how embarrassed I was that I took them to such a crappy place!  I will never eat there again and I hope the go out of business!  Very unprofessional, very nasty food, and just no reason to go there!  I have called them many times to complain but they make it seem because they gave 200 off my bill which was literally nothing we are even.  Well forget that Until I get an apology I will not stop!
4 Blood orange tequila cocktails are good but super strong, we had to order a side of the blood orange. The food is amazing! Best Chinese food . It's a mix between thai and Chinese.... The hakkah drink was yummy! The waitress said it was super sweet so I asked to have it not as sweet. Good atmosphere.
3 The good- This restaurant is really stunning; breathtaking.  The good- Loved the lemongrass veggie dim sum, the spicy shrimp, and the birthday macarons for my girlfriend. Such a  nice complimentary treat.  The so-so- The roast chicken with satay was only okay. The flavors didn't "wow"   The bad- service was a bit on the lax side, friendly but not as attentive as I would have expected for how dead it was. Our food came out quickly... but a bit before our cocktails.  The bad- unfortunately my $18 recommended tequila concoction tasted like straight tequila. I asked for more of the blood orange so we could add it to our drinks, which helped. I was charged $6 for the side!  The good- We were escorted into the nightclub. Though it was strange that at our table they asked if we were on a guest list. We were, but I figured they would have waived our cover regardless. We were each given a voucher for a free cocktail inside the club.  The good- prices really weren't as bad as I was expecting with most dishes at $20-40 for an entree. Rice and noodles are separate however. Our appetizers were only $12 and were quite large.
5 Went here with a group. I called and made reservations and the person on the phone was friendly and accommodating even when I had to call back and up the number of people in our party. The ambiance was nice (dark, would be good for a date night) and the food was good - definitely not authentic Chinese but delicious nonetheless.
3 I usually try to stay away from the overpriced restaurants on the strip because I can get the same type of quality food anywhere else in Vegas for half the price, but I had some friends in town so I made an exception.  Atmosphere 5/5. The low lighting and music, combined with the narrow hallways and open ceilings created a cozy, yet spacious ambiance. Me likey.  Employees 5/5. All the hostesses, waiters, etc. were extremely courteous and friendly. Me double likey.  Food 3.5/5. Very average. It wasn't bad, but it also wasn't great. I expected some sort of mind-blowing type of dish when I dine somewhere as fancy as Hakkasan but maybe that's because I'm a country bumpkin. No likey, no dislikey.  Price 2/5. As far as the bill goes, I wasn't surprised that it came to the amount it had. But because of the fact that the food was extremely average, it didn't justify the amount it came up to. Anywhere else, it would have been half (at least). #firstworldproblems  Overall it was a nice dining experience with top notch service and amenities-but it falls short with the 'slightly' above par food you'd find anywhere at a decent restaurant with a 'not so slightly' price.  Interesting note: the urinals are AMAZING!!! No splash back. NONE!!! (Only men can truly appreciate that fact).
4 Good tasty food. Especially the spinach noodles with lobster. Food a little on the sweeter side but enjoyable meal. Restaurant looks amazing. Forgot our waitress' name and it's a shame because she would be the reason why I will be coming back. Can't beat great customer service
3 Fancy Chinese food you say? If not for the great company I was with, I would not have enjoyed my dinner here. We got the $118/person pre-fixe menu so several courses were served. The duck and scallops were good while the fried dumplings, stir-fry vegetables, spare ribs, prawns and desserts were just okay. I like the layout of the restaurant: each table is enclosed and separated from the rest so you are afforded a more intimate and secluded experience. Our waiter did a really awesome job at filling up the water glasses BUT I couldn't help but noticed that the water glasses were very small. If they used bigger glasses, the wait staff wouldn't have to fill them up so often. But then again, I'm at a fancy restaurant and they aren't known for efficiency optimization.  I think there are much better choices for Chinese food around here, both in terms of price and quality.
4 The place is stunning, great food especially the mongolian beef and duck salad...however the next table was about 10 inches from our table, and when we received our main course they were drewling at our food!! We couldnt even have a conversation we can just talk to everybody next to us. The tables are superclose to each other but The Hakka was A+
4 3.5 stars so I'm rounding up. I went with a group of beautiful friends. I had a hard time finding this place since I lost my glasses. But if I would've known to look for a big blue wall, I wouldn't have ended up outside MGM! We were still waiting for a few people so we had drinks at the bar. I got The Hakka.  We ordered from the $118 prix fixe menu but they also have prix fixe menus starting at $66 as well as a la carte. We had a vegetarian in the group and their vegetarian options actually seemed promising enough for me to want to try it. But no, I'm a carnivore - who am I kidding? From the signature menu, we got a lot of dishes.  The Hakka: Vodka, sake, coconut, lime, passion fruit and lychee juice.  SMALL EAT: Hakka Fried Dim Sum Platter (roasted duck pumpkin puff, XO seafood puff and crispy prawn dumpling).  Jasmine Tea Smoked Beef Short Rib:   Seared Scallop with Fresh Mango and Chili Sauce:  MAIN: Roasted Chilean Seabass with Chinese Honey:  Crispy Roasted Duck with Kumquat and Mustard Sauce:  Braised Tiger Prawn Claypot with Taro in Mandarin Sauce:  Stir-fry Rib Eye Beef with Black Pepper and Merlot:  Stir-fry Sugar Snaps and Cloud Ear:  Egg and Scallion Fried Rice:  DESSERT: Coconut Pudding: Coconut pearl pudding, lime financier topped with caramelized spiced pineapple.  Chocolate and Black Sesame Cremeux: Black sesame Florentine and yuzu ice cream.  Although one might argue that you can get Chinese food for much less in Chinatown, do understand that their version is a bit more sophisticated. They use wagyu, truffles, abalone, etc. which aren't cheap. You're also paying for the location and ambiance.
5 I am sure I can't say enough.... What an AMAZING dinner!  There were 4 of us, nice table, but the food was OUT OF CONTROL GOOD!  Had the Spicy Shrimp, Seared Scallops, Fried Soft Shell Crab....can I tell you I wish I could dine there ALL THE TIME!
5 We were a party of 4 and order several dishes ala carte so we could try a variety. They do offer a fixed menu but we could agree on one so we went a different route.    The food was delicious and the service was outstanding. Our server knew that menu inside and out and she made exceptional recommendations. The sommelier knew his wine and made excellent recommendations as well. I don't know if the strawberries with champagne foam or the PB&J was my favorite dessert. Guess I'll have to go back to decide.
4 If you get one thing out of my review - order the duck salad!!! Just do it.  That was hands down the best dish of our night!    The restaurant is stunning!!  Beautiful decor, ambience, truly tres chic.  The service was wonderful... everyone was kind, attentive, and just great.    The food was good.  I stop short of great.  Perhaps I had higher expectations, but some of it was just okay.  We had the duck salad - that was outstanding.  We also ordered the Jasmine Beef Short Ribs.  I really liked that too.  Very tender, flavorful. But on the flip side, it wasn't anything out of the ordinary.  Almost like any other bbq/teriyaki type of beef.  But it was good.  And we also ordered the Shanghai dumplings. Also tasty and good, but once again, nothing out of the ordinary.  I guess I was expecting more.  The duck salad on the other hand is a dish that isn't like something else at any other restaurant.   For our entrees, we ordered the Beef Merlot and Spicy Shrimp.  The shrimp was good.  It is not fried, it is in a curry like gravy.  It was tasty.  The beef merlot we ordered on the recommendation of many of the yelp reviews.  I wasn't really a fan of that dish.  It wasn't bad. It was tasty, but it wasn't asian fusion and it wasn't anything that I would order again.  Finally, we got the salty fish fried rice.  That was pretty good, but again, no different than something you would get at a regular Chinese restaurant.  Are you getting my drift?  To me, with prices like these and the "style" of restaurant, my expectations are to experience unique dishes that you can't get elsewhere.    As for drinks, I tried the "Chinese" Mule... yes, Moscow mule like drink.  It had an Asian kick with ginger and something else.  It was pretty tasty. Right up my alley because I don't like the sugary sweet stuff.  But if you like the sugary stuff, do The Hakka.  All in all a great experience.  But I wouldn't say my favorite of fine dining in Las Vegas!
2 The room is beautiful and the service was good . A little disappointed in the food of the restaurant. Seemed like to Americanized. Was looking of something more authentic.
4 Pleasantly surprised is all I have to say about my dining experience at Hakkasan. At first, I was truly hesitant about eating at an Asian restaurant on the Strip. You know, being part of the Asian Mafia usually has us frowning upon businesses that are not located on Spring Mountain.   A friend took the time to gather all of us here with the intention of trying it with an open mind. For our party of 6; we ordered four of the $118 tasting menus and a few supplementary items as well. It was more than enough to leave me feeling full and uncomfortable.  We started with the mixed dim sum. All of their dumplings were juicy and cooked to perfection. The crispy duck salad was next. The fact that they could call this a salad is outrageous. It was predominantly chopped up duck meat with a little arugula, pomegranate seeds, and nuts. Don't get the wrong idea. I loved it. It just caught us by surprise. Then the onslaught came. The spicy and sweet lobster was good. The sea bass with honey was odd. The wagyu beef was everything you could ever want. It melts in your mouth. The abalone dish was shaved too fine and came out like eating cartilage. The crispy duck with truffle oil was nuts. I was just craving duck something fierce, too. I left more than satisfied. The green beans dish had a nice kick and the texture of the beef/shrimp combo was good. By the time dessert came around, I was stuffed. The strawberry rhubarb dessert with champagne was lackluster. The rhubarb was undercooked and tough. The chocolate cremeux with yuzu sorbet was good. I would have eaten a whole bowl of the sorbet alone.   The service was excellent as well. Our server was on top of everything. She was present without being overbearing and made the night. Especially after hearing some of the other experiences from friends that went a second time within the week.
5 I can only comment on the bar here as that is as far as we got. One cocktail in and we were hooked. Service was very friendly and made great recommendations as well as great cocktails. I think we ended up killing two hours in the bar before finally making our way into the nightclub. Definitely a great spot if you are looking for drinks before dancing. There is another bar on the second floor too before you make your way into the club.
3 I've been to other Asian restaurants on the strip, and they have one or more of the following issues: low quality food, sad excuses for portions, and/or overpriced dishes.  It's odd to say, but fortunately Hakkasan only suffers from that third one.  The interior is really one gigantic space, but seems like a big labyrinth with multiple rooms and halls due to the tall partitions set up throughout.  There are many dining tables and a bar tucked away in the back.  Some drinks were creative, others were easily available elsewhere, but they'll all run you $15-$20 each.  The menu has many appetizers, sides, and entrees to choose from, as well as a few tasting menus available, which require four people in your party to order.  For a party of six, we ordered four tasting menus and a few other dishes to round out our meal.  For a set menu that is meant for four, it comes with a surprising amount of food that easily filled up the six of us.  Nothing was disappointing, but the standouts for me were the crispy duck salad (they do not skimp on the portions here, if you enjoy duck, get this dish), duck with truffle oil (again, good portions), and the wagyu beef stir fry.  The food was well prepared, in generous portions, and left all of us feeling satisfied.  The part that makes Hakkasan hard to recommend is the pricing.  The tasting menu we ordered was $118 per person, and most dishes are $30 each.  Total for our meal was over $1,000, which is ridiculous for six people eating Chinese food.  Fortunately, and the main reason we came, we were able to enjoy a promotion that got us 50% off our entire bill.  In the end it was around $80 per person, which is much more reasonable, but arguably still a lot.  The pricing at Hakkasan makes it hard place to wholeheartedly recommend, but unlike other Asian restaurants on the Strip you'll actually end up with a good meal if you decide to spend the money here.
2 You are paying for the atmosphere. the food is good, but over priced for what it is. we spent NYE there, it was a preset 7 course meal, $175 per person. The bamboo shoot chicken soup and the rod was the best, albeit everything was served cold and all the  food wasn't served at the same time. I think it should have been $50 per person. the dessert was horrible, it was sesame ice cream with chocolate cookie, the ice cream tasted like nothing and the cookie tasted bitter.y vegetarians friends got a fruit plate and that was def more enjoyable than or fancy dessert. again, the food was decent, just too bad they were served cold! They finally re-heated our last course, by than we were all so full!
1 We had diner with eight friends on New Year's eve. Both the food and service were appalling. Apparently it was the first time they organized diner on New Year's eve and much can be improved... After waiting for 1 hour for one course of our eight course menu, suddenly all food came out simultaneously... and in the wrong order. Some of the food (cod) was cold, some food was overcooked (scallops, sirloin). The waitress was giving our wine to another table, after which she said "I was just checking". We don't mind paying a lot of money for food but then we expect a decent return on our investment. Being treated pretentious is not part of that.
5 Had amazing drinks and a fantastic dining experience at the bar with a couple of friends!  Everything was great!
5 Came here for New Year's Eve and got the Prix Fixe menu.  Was required that night.  All the food was excellent.  Service was excellent as well, except for a mix up where they served me the same entree twice.  Also, their take on Peking Duck was seriously lacking.  It was basically two pancakes with duck skin inside them.  I'm not even sure if there was duck meat.  For 40 bucks extra that was pretty lame.  The table next to us thought so too.  Overall tho I left happy and full.  The restaurant was very spacious with high ceilings.  Not cheap, but worth checking out, considering the rarity of high end Chinese cuisine.
3 You know why I'm giving this place a three star? Because it just wasn't that memorable. I had to look through the pictures on Yelp! to remember even going here. I will say the atmosphere was VERY nice and the servers were also top-notch... but at the end of the day I wouldn't find myself running to go back for a second round. That's not to say the food wasn't great and the drink selections weren't wonderful... it was simply "A-Ok.", as the three stars imply.
5 Seriously amazing cuisine, service and atmosphere. Our server Lilly was so kind and definitely helped us figure out which drinks, appetizers and main dishes to order. Everything was absolutely delicious. My favorite dishes were the Crispy Duck salad, a great combination of unique flavors, on the sweet side but still refreshing. My favorite dish was the Black truffle Roasted duck. the rest of my party loved both these dishes and the res of what we ordered was great too. The dumplings were unique and a definite as well. The braised lobster with spinach noodles was delicious and a quite a different dish that it was very enjoyable to try. Just hate messing with the shells from the lobster.   The atmosphere is intimate, upscale, and modern with interesting water lighting on the far wall. I enjoyed how you could not see the rest of the restaurant except through some patterned walls. It feels like a labyrinth but I very much enjoyed this concept as I do not experience this very often in Las Vegas as most of the restaurants are" see and be seen" type atmospheres.    Over all a wonderful dining experience. Chinese with a modern concept and I like it! I will be back.
4 Swanky Anglicised Cantonese served in a modern, chic Asian inspired dining space.  The food; the dog's bollocks.  Excellent.  Unfortunately combine it's Michelin one star status in London with the typical markup on anything Asian on the Strip, the prices will make you ask if they are taking the piss and leave you gobsmacked. (OK enough British slang).  Not your neighborhood Chinese.  You won't find sweet sour here.  Dishes are individual courses.  Some are meant to be shared, others not.    On this evening, without looking at the menu, asked the server to just bring our party, some of the best dishes.  The result:  Crispy duck salad.  Incredible balance.  The richness of the duck balanced by the bitterness and acidity of pomolo, earthiness of pine nuts and texture from pomegranate seeds.    Braised abalone with black truffles.  Soft, tender, impregnated by the sweetness of Chinese wine, the earthy flavor of the truffle the aroma enhances the sweetness of the abalone.    Peking duck with caviar.  Not the classic Peking duck (this one has some breast meat attached) but wow, soft pancake, pungent scallion and snappy cucumber, crisp duck skin and to top it off, caviar whose oceanic flavor adds an incredible, unexpected complexity.   A delicate, crisp quail with Chinese five spice and chili sauce, a perfectly roasted Chilean sea bass with Chinese honey whose sweet but bitter notes brings out the natural flavor of the fish, an nontraditional fried and steamed dim sum platter whose freshness, taste, and quality, will put all but the best to shame rounded out the meal.  Service is very efficient and friendly.  The wine list, well chosen.  Typical Vegas resort prices.   So, $245 for Peking duck, $188 per order of abalone, worth it?  Elevated to this level, bloody well right.
5 Duck & Black Pepper Dim Sum. Sweet and Sour Pork. Garlic Calamari.  Everything was amazing.  The ambiance was lively, modern, and chic.  The set-up offered a lot of privacy while still being a part of the restaurant.  Lots of VIPs.  The food was definitely the star of the show.  We ordered a little bit of everything and everything was impressive.  Even the vegetarian options were filling and satisfying.
5 I am such a fan of this place because you get both ideal worlds for a perfect date night: great dinner and dancing (without having to wait for a long line if you dine in).  The best modern chic Asian food and the ambience was so well done fusing modern Chinese decor.  So impressive.  Appetizer:  Dimsum sampler (so good! not greasy, the sauces were amazing) Entree:  Roasted Duck with kumquat, pork belly Sides:  fried rice and pak choi Dessert:  very stunning presentation and soooo good with lots of different flavor that just bursts in your mouth specifically the coconut pudding and the passion fruit panne cotte  The Buddha's Palm cocktails were so great!  Club was so chic and the DJs were awesome.  The only complaint is the dance floor is a bit smaller that what it could be.  Super tight and crowded until 2AM when everyone started to slowly leave the cllub.   Will definitely come back here again for another date night or for a group!  Overall amazing, fun and great night!  Thanks Hakkasan!
3 Good place to go to for Chinese authentic meal
5 This place is amazing, service is impeccable food is great. The energy & ambiance of the this place is wonderful. Staff is very polite & helpful when asking questions about the menu. So this is my first experience of what I call fine dining and first experience of a Michelin star restaurant.  We arrived at the restaurant at 8pm. 8.01pm we were seated, and given the wine menu at 8.02pm we had bottled water, and by 8.05 we had our wine, tasted and poured in both glasses! So about the wine and water, we never had to pour any into our glasses, there was always a waiter around to do this for us. Top service.  The food is only what I can class as the best I have ever had, starter, main and deserts all highly rated. I recommend the mango\duck starter and sea bass cooked in honey for the main. The wait between courses were minimal. Even though we only had a table for 2 hours, it didnt seem rushed to put away a bottle of red and 3 courses.  The atmosphere of the restaurant is very nice, warm and welcoming, as soon as you walk in you are greeted and asked for your coat and then escorted to your table. There is an ambient lighting. The tables are quite close to each other, which is always an issue to me especially when having private conversations, however on a Saturday night because the atmosphere and noise levels its not much of a problem.  Its not crazy expensive, but for me its not cheap. You could easily blow what we spent on good food on a night out, so its worth a visit if you have a special occasion. Its opened me up to a whole world of fine dining and given the opportunity I shall be returning!
4 It's been 9 years since I went to the Hakkasan in London.  Ever since I have been waiting for the delayed Vegas location for my annual Vegas trip.  If I could pinpoint a time in life that I started "appreciating" craft cocktails and dim sum it started in London.  And the Vegas location did not disappoint.  Every aspect of service and quality of food was on point.  Can't wait to return.
2 Alright.. There are a lot of positive reviews here and I think it is way overrated.  Everything was way overpriced for "chinese fusion".  Its like they took the sweet side of the chinese flavors and fused it with american sized portions and pricing.  We opted for a more carb-free version and shared this between 6 people: + crispy duck salad which had lots of sweet, salty, and fatty flavors going on.  best dish IMO - seared scallops with fresh mango in chili sauce which was cooked well but nothing extraordinary on the flavors. - Jasmine tea smoked beef short rib, the waitress cut it up for us but it seemed like a typical dish. -Stir-fry lotus root with royal trumpet in sweet XO sauce was definitely on the sweet side and overwhelmed the natural flavors of the lotus root and royal trumpet --Lobster soup with tofu and Chinese yellow chive was probably the worst soup dish ever.  for the price we paid (it was like high 20s) it was a small little bowl that barely had any lobster.  What happened to family style dishes? -Hakka braised pork belly claypot, pork belly was melt in your mouth tender with a sweet sauce.  nothing spectacular. +Braised lamb shank with Chinese herbs was pretty good as it was meat falling off the bone and not overseasoned.  It might be to gamey for some, but it was perfect for me. +Roasted Chilean seabass with Chinese honey was another good one that had the fish just flaking off -Crispy chicken in lemon sauce which reminded me of a chicken katsu covered in a lemon sauce. nothing extraordinary.  Total bill came out to about $465 with gratuity and that included a round of drinks.    Ambiance was definitely really nice as everything was well decorated in the restaurant, hip music in the background, and dim lighting (although too dim for my friend as she could not read the menu).  Service was really good as they were very tentative and water cups were never empty.  A plus side is that they escorted us to the club afterward and we did not have to wait in line to get in.  It was the price and food portion that would deter me from coming back.  I could have gotten traditional chinese food without all the nice service and ambiance for about $100.  But its Vegas.. just roll with it sometimes.
5 Date & Time:  Friday January 29, 2014 @ 8pm Location:  MGM Grand Dining Companions:  Mommy & Husband Scene:  Guys in Jeans, Open Collar Shirts, Blazers & Girls in Short Herve Leger Dresses, Sky-High Louboutins + Mini Chanel Bags Music:  EDM Service:  5-Stars Imbibe:  Signature Hakka Cocktail Devour:  Duck Salad, Steamed Dim Sum Platter, Pork Belly, Sweet & Sour, Beef Medallions, Champagne Cod, Hakka Noodles & Fried Rice.  Macarons for Dessert Total:  $398
4 Our table of 7 ordered the $118 per person prix fixe menu and everything tasted great.  This is by far the most i've ever paid for chinese food and i prob would'nt do it again.  My wife's mother would have killed us for eating here. hahaha   Service was great...not Gary Danko great but still attentive. The restaurant itself was really dark tho. There were a lot of areas at our table that the overhead light just didnt reach and it was hard to read the menu or see the food.  It was a good experience to try a lot of different dishes, but I wouldn't do it again..at least not that prix fixe menu. My favorites were the jasmine tea smoked beef short rib, black pepper beef ribeye and the sea bass.
5 Had a great meal here before we hit the strip for the night. The drinks were spot on, along with the food. We received excellent service from the staff and after we were personally escorted up to the club to our table
4 Excellent and attentive service by hostesses and servers. Every item we had was delicious. Mongolian beef, Duck Salad, dim sum, hot and sour soup, noodle dish, and desserts were great. There was a stale dried cornucopia noodle thing that came with one of the dishes. Otherwise, everything was solid.
3 Overpriced, Mediocre Chinese Food.   I was excited to try Hakkasan and went with a buddy of mine.  We are lucky to have been to a lot of great places in Vegas, so we were looking forward to eating at Hakkasan.  As suggested by the server, excellent service by the way, we ordered two small plates and two entrees.  For the "small eats," we ordered the Hakka Steamed Dim Sum Platter and the salt and pepper squid.  For the entrees, we ordered crispy roasted duck with kumquat and mustard sauce and a special from the Chinese new year menu, a sea bass dish.  The small plates were both disappointing.  While looking over the menu, I asked what "Chinese Honey" was since I had never heard of it before.  As I suspected, it was just a made up ingredient that the kitchen created and labeled as "Chinese honey."  Either way, the dim sum was bland and overpriced.  I could have gone to Ping Pang Pong or Cathy House and gotten much better dim sum for a quarter of the price and larger portions.  As for the salt and pepper squid, both Ping Pang Pong and China Mama's are much better.    The Chinese new year sea bass was exceptional.  It was super flavorful, had great texture, and I would order it again.  As for the crispy roasted duck with kumquat and mustard sauce, it severely lacked balance and needed some type of sweetness.  Otherwise, it was simple bland with one note of flavor related to the mustard.    All in all, Hakkasan is a lovely restaurant with great service.  If you want a nice experience, you should check it out, especially if you are going to the nightclub afterwards since you can get easy access to the club through the Lily Lounge.  But the food is definitely mediocre and overpriced.
1 WAY OVERPRICED FOR SMALL PORTIONS!!! We were a party of 3 couples celebrating our friend's wedding. We expected high prices but this place was ridiculous; $120 per person for Chinese Food, give me a break. The food was good, don't get me wrong, but portions were exceedingly small in spite of the fact that our waiter claimed that all the entree's could be shared. We did share the entrees and each of us got three bites. The service was mediocre for a place  that charges these prices, very little interaction between the waiter and our party. The food basically put down on the table without very little comment. All and all (and $700 later) a big disappointment.
5 Las Vegas Restaurant Week 7 - 14 Mar 2014 so I had dinner here on Sat/8 Mar: http://www.HelpOutDineOutlv.org/     menu supporting charity  http://bit.ly/1h5HXPD  - $50.14 for 4-course dinner of great food at a swanky Strip eatery was a steal. - $12 for Ketel One & seltzer was cheaper than I expected (at Hakkasan Nightclub a small bottle of Fiji water is $9).  No problem also getting free ice water (I've read on Yelp that the Nightclub bartenders won't get out free ice water). - Last time for dinner reservations is 11:15 pm but I called too late (about 7 pm?) to book any reservation in the dining room.  I was able to do a walk-in, grab a seat at the bar and eat there.  My bartender Krista (Christa?) was really cool.  - About 9:50 pm I had entered Hakkasan Nightclub so I could get my club stamps and have a look before using the elevator to go down to the restaurant.  After dinner (about 12:10 pm) I walked up 2 flights of stairs and entered the Ling Ling Lounge (sit anywhere you want, no bottle service mandatory).   From there I had to show my club stamps to the bouncer to continue to the Ling Ling Club and finally to the Hakkasan Nightclub. - Bonus: Upon paying my dinner/bar tab I received a "$50 Hakkasan Gift Voucher...Thank you for dining with us during Las Vegas Restaurant Week."  I was flabbergasted that the meal was only $50.14 and I got a $50 "gift voucher valid until April 10, 2014."  I almost felt guilty accepting it.  When my buddy is in town early Apr, will definitely bring him here.
5 *** Review is for Spring Restaurant Week 2014 menu ***  This was a late addition to my Restaurant Week lineup.  I'm so glad I made the change.  I was warmly greeted at reception and asked to wait until one of the people who seat you arrived.  A short time later, I was taken to my table through what appeared to be a maze of small hallways and dining spaces.  I was seated at a table in a section near the bar that was L shaped.  Soon, the server, Carmen, arrived and she asked me about drinks.  I ordered an iced tea and that was brought quickly with a small container of simple syrup.  I had studied the menu online and I knew what I wanted except for the main course.  I asked Carmen for her advice.  For the first course, I went with the stir fried spicy quail with fresh lily bulb.  The dish was prepared with Chinese 5 spice and chili sauce.  It had a really nice tang but it was not overpowering, just very good!  There were two legs and 2 wings--a very ample serving for a starter.  For the main course, I went with the stir fried venison with spicy yellow bean sauce.  There were three thin slices of venison in a great spicy sauce.  With the venison, I was served two sides--a small container of fried pak choi with garlic and a small bowl of vegetable fried rice.  Carmen brought me a knife and fork for this course knowing it would be easier to deal with the meat.  I had requested wooden chopsticks (they don't have them) because I am very poor at using plastic chopsticks.  Things slip off plastic chopsticks very easily even when I'm just looking at them.  I'll have to bring in my own wooden ones or my screw together metal chopsticks that were a gift.  Again, the dish was spicy but it was not overpowering spicy.  It was quite enjoyable.  There is no choice for dessert.  You get a passion fruit panna cotta with, as the menu says, citrus supremes, guava gelato, and blood orange sorbet.  Carmen had me listen to a crackling sound when she first brought the dessert.  She wouldn't tell me what it was but said I should try it and we'd talk about it when I was done.  I had two things in mind for what it was.  I was correct with the second idea.  They put some pop rocks on the panna cotta to make a bit of a texture play.  The panna cotta was very good.  To sum up, the food really is the "dog's bollocks!" (Thanks R).  Portion size was just right and they downsized the sides because I was dining alone.  The room is delightful--not one large room but made up of many smaller areas.  The restaurant really isn't all they big in the great scheme of things.  Service was excellent.  Before bringing the bill, Carmen brought me a coupon good for $50 on my next visit as long as it's used before April 10.  She said, "It's like having your dinner tonight for $.14."  I will be back and use the coupon.  I have to do the sea bass which she said was their most popular dish and is excellent.    One short aside:  I can hike in the desert where there's no trail.  Leaving last night without an escort, I ended up almost in the kitchen.  Then I realized I had almost made a complete trek around the outside ring of the place.  I did make it to the door and was somewhat embarrassed getting lost in the small space.  It's a like a maze!  I'm glad that Restaurant Week gives me the chance to try some new places that I normally wouldn't.
5 5 Stars because this is a unique take on Chinese food and some dishes were amazing.  The depth of those dishes is unlike any Chinese food I've ever had.  Amazing : Crab & Corn soup - depth of flavours was great. Crispy Duck Salad - unexpalainable.  You have to order it to get it. Hakka Noodle - simple but so good. Silver Cod - champagne & Chinese honey.  Really melts in your mouth.  Very Good : Hot & Sour soup - best hot & sour soup ever Sea Bass with Chinese honey Rib Eye with Merlot - taste very good but I expected more. Crispy quail  Average : Dim Sum platter Spicy Prawns - it was not what I expected as this is a green curry dish. Chicken & Salted fish fried rice Panna Cotta - sour but you can't stop eating  Yeah it is costly but worth the amazing dishes.  I will be back next time in LV
5 My boyfriend and I ate here lAst night and enjoyed it . The food was Delish and I highly recommend the duck salad . Our server kat a. Was very friendly and attentive and she also had some great recommendations. The drink the Hakka is AMAZING !! A must try , I am craving it today!
2 I am a Las Vegas regular and we always eat at the best and hottest restaurants in Vegas.  We decided to try this place to get something different.  The restaurant itself has a horrible set up.  The flow of the tables and divided rooms are quite odd.  The food was marginal at best.  The prices were equivalent to Nobu, but the food was equivalent to PF Changs.  I would never go here again for the price or atmosphere.  There are many better options in Vegas.
4 Ponied up at bar before it got too busy. No one at the bar but me and a couple others. Hakkasan restaurant is UBER sexy but I was a little put off by the snotty female bartenders. Even the lady sitting at the bar next to me noticed their dismissive behavior without my saying a word.   For starters, it took forever to be acknowledged. When she finally comes over, there was no smile. No friendly greeting. Just a plain face and a cocktail napkin put in front of me and a blank look. She eventually loosened up, but only after I made an effort to connect with her. Should be the other way around though. Just saying. The lady next to me with her BF asked the other bartender what was in a particular specialty cocktail she was making. Bartender looked at her and plainly said...vodka. Then walked away. Wow!!!  If I were giving out stars for service, I'd dole out a 2+. But the quality, creativity and showmanship of the cocktails made up for the bad behavior of a couple mean girls.    My first cocktail was a vodka made with quinoa. It was really smooth with a sweet, clean finish.  After dinner I ordered the Smoky Negroni cocktail (Ransom Old Tom barrel aged gin, Antica Formula vermouth, Campari and Grand Marnier smoke infusion). Tasted very similar to an Old Fashioned. Classic with a twist. Very good!   For food I ordered the Hakka braised pork belly clay pot. Very tender and full of garlic and gingery flavors. It's a little rich, so I'd recommend sharing this dish as an appetizer.   Like most LV restaurants of this caliber, be prepared for a $$$$ experience.   Enjoy!
1 Amateur hour as far as management and staff.  We had someone at the table with a shellfish allergy, which was announced, and both the kitchen and service staff mixed the order, which almost ended very, very badly.  The only thing they offered for their extreme mistake, was a bottle of wine.  That's just not what someone who has just medicated themselves should be offered.  Oh yeah, they didn't comp the dumplings that almost killed the person.  Not even kidding.  Anyway, the food was ok.  Some good (duck salad) and some bad (dumplings, hot and sour soup and smoked short rib, which was really quite terrible).  Expect to pay more than you should, and if you have any allergies at all, I just wouldn't trust these folks with your well-being.  Hope that helps.
4 I went with a friend last Wednesday night: I have one thing to say: BEST SEA BASS EVER!!!! The fried rice was really good and the Dim sum appetizer was sooo good! I gave it a 4 as we also ordered another dish, chicken thai basil, and we were disappointed. It was not bad, it just was't great. For dessert, we shared a chocolate dessert and it was sinful! I will definitely be going back... I heard I need to try the duck salad as really good. The food was delicious, and the restaurant has definitely won my approval!
3 I had dinner here before david copperfield. First impression is that I liked the ambiance. The service was 5 star. The food portions were fairly stingy and very expensive. I would rate the food a 7 out of 10. Nothing special. The bill was 240.00 for two people and we don't drink. we had soft drinks. so thats one appetizer,two entrees and fried rice and two desserts for 240??? I would say that speaks for itself. I think the portions could be bigger I also found the menu a bit on the limited side. But its all part of eating on the strip.
3 First, the design and atmosphere of the restaurant are amazing. Our waitress was pretty good but a smile wouldn't have killed her. We were told the plates were meant for sharing so my boyfriend and I ordered two chicken dishes, the Hakka noodles (which were awesome), and rice. In hindsight we should have ordered another small plate or vegetable because we were still a little hungry. We got the house made macarons for dessert, which were good. The reason I am only giving 3 stars is because the chicken dishes were average at best. I can't comment on the other meat or fish dishes but hopefully they are much better, especially for the price. I would definitely go back for drinks but probably not for dinner.
4 I love the sf location and I love this one too. You can't go wrong coming here and I highly recommend it.  I really liked the decor, very stylish and modern. The food is great as well, very good presentation. Service was very efficient and professional. Two thumbs way up!
5 Simply amazing foodie experience! Some of the best gourmet Chinese food I have ever eaten. The soothing ambience was zen like. My hubby and I felt like we had retreated into a quiet cocoon away from the noisy casino. We ate at 5:45 on a weekday prior to seeing a show. Our server was knowledgeable and gave us a lot of insight into the menu . The cocktails were off the hook! So unique and beautifully presented. The Budda's Palm was my fav. Tried the duck salad, the tea smoked short ribs, the Hakkasan dim sum plate and the pipa duck with the chive egg rice. We could not find fault with anything. I can't wait to return. It's that good!
1 I have heard amazing things about the London location and this one as well, however this was the worst meal I have ever had in Vegas. I would have rather had Panda Express for dinner. The chicken was dry and horrible, the lobster stir fry was over sauced, and the drink I ordered was average. The only edible item I ordered was the fried rice, which is pathetic. $500 + later, I would have much rather stayed at home and microwaved a pf changs frozen dinner. Horrible Chinese food! All about the hype and the atmoshpere!
5 Try the Shanghai dumplings, lettuce wrap,  Chilean seabass, tofu with eggplant,  Hakka noodles, asparagus, and macarons!  Delish!  Server's and bartenders know their stuff here and it has an awesome romantic vibe.
5 Loved this place to death! When am I coming back? Can't be soon enough! Great service food and cocktails...
4 I went here with a group of 7 on a Friday night and was impressed overall. The host staff was nice enough to work us in despite not having a reservation. Our server, Joe, provided some of the most impeccable service I've had during a dining experience.  We tried a huge variety of menu options. The things that stood out to me were the dumplings and the Hakka noodles. Don't waste your time with the Chicken with satay sauce. It is far too sweet with an overwhelming amount of fennel. The stir-fry ribeye and the Wok-fried Wagyu with sesame sauce were both very good but not out of this world. I don't particularly recall much about the other dishes we tried.  Overall, it was a solid experience significantly aided by incredible service.
5 My husband and I were in the MGM and decided to try this new restaurant we ended up sitting at the bar it was a very happening place we were greeted by a friendly bartender named Brittany she is amazing she explained all the drinks and recommend the Hakka mmmm so good I had two.  She also recommended crispy duck salad it was yummy too.  The service here is 10 stars if your ever in the MGM try this restaurant and sit at the bar Brittany will take good care of you!!
2 It saddens me to write this review because I really did love the food and experience at the Miami location but the food did not seem up to par here and everything was extremely rushed..probably because most of the attention is on the nightclub. It was very annoying for such an expensive place to rush you through dinner...the waitress was very persistent and asked to take our plates away before we had even finished the food in front of us.. I do not think I will be returning..
5 I would give this place 5 stars for ambiance alone. It's just an awesome bonus that the food happens to be some of the best I've ever had.   I had an important dinner meeting with a client. A client who happens to be a high class world traveler and he was blown away by the food and ambiance as well. Let me tell you, he is not easily impressed.   They had a wonderful wine selection. And, were extremely helpful in finding me a wine based on my descriptions. It was one of the best Pinot Noirs I've had.   Honestly, this is a place I will definitely come back to with friends and family.   Well done Hakkasan! top notch all around.
5 Everytime I come here it's overwhelming how great the service is, this is the kind of experience that really sets the bar so high that you will always compare others to this place.  The food is nothing short of outstanding and it's remarkable how fast this kitchen can produce and beatyfully present such a product, the logistics of such an operation is mindblowing.  You really have to give this a try, you will never look at restaurants the same way.
5 With all the billboards in this town promoting top-flight DJs and parties at Hakkasan, it's easy to forget that there is a restaurant hidden inside the nightclub.  And that's too bad, because what a restaurant it is!  The menu is made up of modern takes on Cantonese classics, but the flavors never steer too far away from the originals.  The dining room is impressive and very easy to get lost in (leave a trail of bread crumbs), but the friendly staff always helps you find your way back to your table.  The bar is long and beautiful and features an impressive cocktail program.  Bring a small group of friends, get a bottle of sake (or wine), and choose a number of dishes to share.  Try the duck salad. And don't forget about dessert!
5 Absolutely my favorite place to dine in Vegas. Here's why:  THE SERVICE - the staff is fantastic,they are ever-present but not hovering,very polite and approachable and are more than happy to answer any questions you might have. My favorite server is Maggie,she's waited on us a couple times before and remembers me by face - a rarity when you wait on a multitude of people.   THE AMENITIES - everything in the place is class; they have an ice bucket in every section,so the servers can come and freshen your beverage at any time. Paper towels or hand dryers in the bathrooms? No sir,there's an attendant who hands you a warm towel to dry your hands.   THE FOOD - oh my god. The food. If everything else in this place was sub-par,the food would still get them a 5-star rating in my book. From their starters to the custom Hakkasan cocktails they serve,everything is one of a kind. Vegetarian and gluten-free options are available on the menu as well.   My favorite options on the menu are the crispy duck roll appetizers (well,anything duck,really) and the braised pork belly platter (literally melts in your mouth). The dim sum is superb as well,as they feature a mixed platter as part of their signature dishes which includes seafood and poultry.   A must try,definitely. And when you're done (if you're on the guest list),you're more than welcome to go through the back entrance into the 3-story nightclub that feature some of the top-tier DJ talent (Tiësto,Calvin Harris,Hardwell,etc.)in the world!
5 Expensive. Very expensive. Chinese food is like Mexican food. It should be two things: greasy and cheap.  But what Hakkasan does have is excellent service. Fantastic cocktails and beautiful ambiance. With a grandmother from China and being born and raised in San Francisco, paying $28 for 5 pieces of dim sum (which costs $3 anywhere here and is just as good-if not better) is a crime. But, you're paying for the ambiance. And it is good
4 My boyfriend and I had reservations for 9pm for his 30th. Upon our arrive, we were guided to the bar area while our table was being set up. I loved the Blue lights and modern decor. It really sets the mood to be in Vegas at a fine dining restaurant. I order the very sexy Cocktail- Strawberry and Basil Martini--SO AMAZING!  Dinner: our server was Carmen- She was so great!   We decided to go with:   Seared scallop with fresh mango in chili sauce- by far the best cooked scallops. Crispy crust and butter soft inside. I loved this dish!  Hakka noodle with mushrooms and Chinese chive- very good and great portion for sharing  Chicken and salted fish fried rice- the salted fish was our fav.   Overall very good dining experience and great food.
5 winner winner chinese dinner. Just like the SF location everything was fantastic. Server was very good. From the dim sum platter to the duck breast to the 2 desserts everything were was a winner
5 everything about this place is great, love it love it. no need to say more
4 We came here for our company dinner. We were offered 3 menus prior and choose the sparrow menu. They were also able to personalize the menu. We mainly chose it for the vegetarian options which everyone enjoyed. It was family style so we all shared. Some dishes were a hit and some were a miss. The service was good but it did take them a while to bring over any requests. I wouldn't call this Cantonese food, it is definitely fusion. It would be a good plan for group outings but be aware they have minimum charge per person.
4 food was GREAT price  isnt too bad either  Loved my waitress she was super nice  the decor is very impressive a little dark but i enjoyed the ambiance music wasnt to loud and the the service was quick   no complaints..
5 The best service I have had in a long time. This bar is AMAZING. I started off my bachelorette party here in Hakkasan LV with some Crispy duck salad with pomelo, pomegranate and pine nut followed by Hot and sour soup with chicken! I ordered some Braised tiger prawn claypot with taro in Mandarin sauce and fried rice and left with my tummy happy ready to shake my booty with my besties at the club above the restaurant. Do yourself a favor, go here and thank me later.
5 Came here for dinner, seated right away. Food was amaze balls, service was great! Carmen was our waitress and knew the entire menu and was extremely helpful. Got the pipa duck. So amazing. All of our food was delish!!!! So recommend this place.
4 Amazing ambiance, great food and drinks....Great place for a romantic dinner! The service was decent and friendly. It's also pretty cool that you can party at the club after dinner.
4 Made a last minute reservation here and were pleased to learn they had an open table. Due to problems with our hotel, we were gonna be late to our reservation. We called and pushed it back, and they were able to totally accommodate it.   Once we got there, we were very pleased to see how well put together the restaurant was. I really loved the décor! The staff was great, were very attentive, and we neger had an empty glass of water.   We kind of ventured out a little and ate one of each kind of meat...pork belly, duck, steak, and chicken. The only one we loved was the steak. We had the coconut pinapple tapioca pudding for desert and it was very very good! We ordered a variety of drinks but the favorite was the strawberry basil martini, even though it had a pretty weird kick.  Would I try this place again? Maybe...but I'd order the steak.
4 Dined here with my fiancé and had a really great meal with attentive service.  We tried several dishes including the steamed dim sum selection, sesame prawn toast with foie gras and silver cod roasted in champagne. All were tasty!  In particular I really liked the ambience of Hakkasan- the tables are far apart and the decor separates the dining room into sections which creates an intimate dining experience.  We found out that if you dine at the restaurant you can return later with your receipt and access the nightclub through the Hakkasan lounge area, bypassing the line. Dining here meant that we gained access to the nightclub for free which was an added bonus!
4 man,this place was pricey for chinese food. but, it was absolutely delicious! it was for the most part, standard asian fusion/chinese flare but packed an extra punch. also probably why they charge 300percent over Panda Express. :)  very elegant use of the space here. dimly lit and long facades covering the tables. maze like walkway to get to your table. very secret garden like. and sexy.   service was pretty good. at the table we ordered some dim sum, the pork belly, the udon noodles, the haka noodles and the sweet and sour pork. everything was magnificent. the pork belly just melted like butter. the noodles were perfectly seasoned and not too salty. the sweet and sour pork was crunchy and tangy. oh, and the dim sums were all amazing.   prices were not too crazy considering this place is apparently one of the new IT restaurants on the Strip. 2 couples with a couple rounds of drinks at just $300 with tip. oh, and we got complimentary admission to the Club!
2 No expense spared meal. Service from Lilly the sever and our sommelier was very good but the food was downright terrible for this price point ($250 pp). I've eaten at the top places in Vegas in comparison (eg, roubouchon, Savoy, etc). Avoid unless it's free.
3 Hakka-freaking-MAZE!!!  Seriously so easy to lose someone.. OR get dizzy, throw-up, then get kicked out..  ANYWAYS... Hakkasan is HUGE! Can't believe it has 5 levels! Our friend decided to celebrate her birthday here and she got a table in the Ling Ling Club. Supposedly they play hip-hop here but all I really remember hearing was techno, with very little hip-hop.   Cocktail waitresses were accommodating to our every drunk need, even the security was very nice! LOL.  Besides the labyrinth I had to go through, I'm hoping to experience Hakkasan in the future and get a better look, maybe even try the restaurant!
